Louisiana, session 2026, HB855.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:322(C)(6)(d) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§322. Seines or nets; size of mesh; classification as to salt or fresh water; crawfish
traps
* * *
C. The following provisions shall apply to saltwater areas:
* * *
(6) Purse Seines.
* * *
(d) The use of purse seines shall only be permitted in water with a depth of
at least twenty-two feet.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-520 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 855